Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2148
Payment by defendant of sums due; effect.

Whenever a complaint is filed for the satisfaction or foreclosure of any mortgage, upon which there is due any interest on any portion or installment of the principal, and there are other portions or installments to become due subsequently, the complaint shall be dismissed upon the defendant's bringing into court, at any time before the decree of sale, the principal and interest due, with costs.

R.S.1867, Code § 856, p. 544;

R.S.1913, § 8265;

C.S.1922, § 9218;

C.S.1929, § 20-2150;

R.S.1943, § 25-2148;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 38.

Stipulation in mortgage accelerating debt for failure to pay interest or taxes will be enforced. Crawford v. Houser, 115 Neb. 62, 211 N.W. 165 (1926).

Holder may foreclose when any installment has become due; statute begins to run on each when due. Nares v. Bell, 66 Neb. 606, 92 N.W. 571 (1903).

Deposit of money with clerk of court in vacation did not extinguish indebtedness. Commercial Investment Co. v. Peck, 53 Neb. 204, 73 N.W. 452 (1897).